Utah statutes.
78B-1-115.   Jurors -- Penalties.

(1)  A person who fails to respond timely to questions regarding qualification for jury service shall be in contempt of court and subject to penalties under Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 3, Contempt.

(2)  A person summoned for jury service who fails to appear or to complete jury service as directed shall be in contempt of court and subject to penalties under Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 3, Contempt.

(3)  Any person who willfully misrepresents a material fact regarding qualification for, excuse from, or postponement of jury service is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

